West Virginia, session 2026, HB5600.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 29. LAW-ENFORCEMENT TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION. §30-29-2. Law-enforcement professional standards subcommittee. (a) The Law-Enforcement Professional Standards Subcommittee is continued as a subcommittee of the Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency and Correction. The subcommittee has the following responsibilities:(1) Review and administer programs for qualification, training and certification of law-enforcement officers in the state; and(2) Consider applications by law-enforcement officers whose certification is deemed inactive as a result of his or her separation from employment with a law-enforcement agency.(b) The subcommittee shall be comprised of eleven members, including one representative of each of the following:(1) West Virginia State Police;(2) Law-enforcement section of the Department of Natural Resources;(3) West Virginia Sheriffs' Association;(4) West Virginia Association of Chiefs of Police;(5) West Virginia Deputy Sheriffs' Association;(6) West Virginia State Lodge Fraternal Order of Police;(7) West Virginia Municipal League;(8) West Virginia Association of County Officials;(9) Human Rights Commission;(10) West Virginia Troopers Association; and(11) Office of the State Fire Marshal; and(12) The public at large.(c) The subcommittee shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson. Special meetings may be held upon the call of the chairperson, vice chairperson or a majority of the members of the subcommittee. A majority of the members of the subcommittee who are present in person, by proxy or designation, or by electronic means constitutes a quorum. Any member appointed to the subcommittee who is a written designated representative has the full rights of a member, including the right to vote, serve on subcommittees or perform any other function.